California, session 20252026, SB82.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1670.15 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1670.15. (a) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Consumer” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 302 of the Business and Professions Code.(2) “Consumer use agreement” means a contract between a person and a consumer that the consumer enters into in order to use, receive, or otherwise enjoy a good, service, money, or credit.(3) “Person” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 302 of the Business and Professions Code.(b) Dispute resolution terms and conditions of a consumer use agreement shall be limited to the use, payment, or provision of the good, service, money, or credit provided by that consumer use agreement.(c) A waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to public policy and void and unenforceable.(d) This section shall be liberally construed for the purpose of protecting consumers.(e) The duties and obligations imposed by this section are cumulative with duties or obligations imposed under any other law, shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under any other law, and do not limit any rights or remedies under any other law.